Utah statutes.
20A-11-901.   Political advertisements -- Requirement that ads designate
responsibility and authorization -- Unauthorized use of endorsements.
(1) (a)  Whenever any person makes an expenditure for the purpose of financing
an advertisement expressly advocating the election or defeat of a clearly
identified candidate, or solicits any contribution through any broadcasting
station, newspaper, magazine, outdoor advertising facility, direct mailing, or
any other type of general public political advertising, the advertisement:
(i)  if paid for and authorized by a candidate or the candidate's campaign
committee, shall clearly state that the advertisement has been paid for by the
candidate or the campaign committee;
(ii)  if paid for by another person but authorized by a candidate or the
candidate's campaign committee, shall clearly state who paid for the
advertisement and that the candidate or the campaign committee authorized the
advertisement; or
(iii)  if not authorized by a candidate or his campaign committee, shall
clearly state the name of the person who paid for the advertisement and state
that the advertisement is not authorized by any candidate or candidate's
committee.
(b)  The requirements of Subsection (1)(a) do not apply to:
(i)  lawn signs with dimensions of four by eight feet or smaller;
(ii)  bumper stickers;
(iii)  campaign pins, buttons, and pens; and
(iv)  similar small items upon which the disclaimer cannot be conveniently
printed.
(2)  A person may not, in  order to promote the success of any candidate for
nomination or election to any public office, or in connection with any
question submitted to the voters, include or cause to be included the name of
any person as endorser or supporter in any political advertisement, circular,
poster, or publication without the express consent of that person.
(3) (a)  It is unlawful for a person to pay the owner, editor, publisher, or
agent of any newspaper or other periodical to induce him to advocate or oppose
editorially any candidate for nomination or election.
(b)  It is unlawful for any owner, editor, publisher, or agent to accept any
payment to advocate or oppose editorially any candidate for nomination or
election.
